src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON MINEMA    ! only minema 

             +Pers+Prs:lähe%{W%} IND_PRS ;       ! lähen, läheb, ...
             +Pers+Prs:lähe%{W%}%> CONDITIONAL ;  ! läheks, ...
   +Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2:mine%{W%}%> NO_COMPOUND ;          ! mine
+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff+Usage/Rare:läh%{W%}%>me NO_COMPOUND ;  ! lähme more colloquial...
                      :min%{dbl%}%> A_INFINITIVE ;       ! minna
                      :min%{W%} IMPERATIVE ;     ! mingu
                      :läi%{W%} NU ;             ! läinud
         +Pers+Prt+Ind:läk%>s SG3 ;              ! läks
         +Pers+Prt+Ind:läk%>s MARKED_PERSON ;    ! läksin, läksid etc
                      :mine SUPINE_V ;           ! minema
                      :min%{dbl%}%>d IMPERS_DUD ;        ! mindud
                      :min%{dbl%}%{W%}%> IMPERS_AKSE ;   ! minnakse
          +Usage/NotNorm:min%{dbl%}%>d IMPERS_AKSE ;         ! mindakse
                      :min%{dbl%}»d IMPERS_DER ;       ! mindav, ... 

!--------
LEXICON IND_COND_PRS    ! indicative, conditional present + imp sg2
   +Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2:%> NO_COMPOUND ;
             +Pers+Prs:%> IND_PRS ;
             +Pers+Prs:%> CONDITIONAL ;
                      : NG_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON IND_PRS         ! indicative present 
              +Ind+Neg:   NO_COMPOUND ;
                  +Ind:   SG1 ;
                  +Ind:   SG2 ;
                  +Ind:b  SG3 ;
                  +Ind:   PL1 ;
                  +Ind:   PL2 ;
                  +Ind:va PL3 ;

LEXICON IND_PAST_SUPINE    ! common to many inflectional types
                      : IND_PAST ;
                      : SUPINE_V ;
            
LEXICON IND_PAST_I    ! indicative past without -s (tegi, nägi, pidi, tõi, sõi, jõi, lõi, sai, jäi, pesi, kusi, oli, tuli, pani, suri)
         +Pers+Prt+Ind:%>i SG3 ;
         +Pers+Prt+Ind:%>  MARKED_PERSON ;

LEXICON IND_PAST    ! indicative past
         +Pers+Prt+Ind:%>I7S7 SG3 ;
         +Pers+Prt+Ind:%>I7S7 MARKED_PERSON ;

LEXICON INF_IMP_NU  ! common to almost all words 

                      : INFINITIVE ;        ! elada, naerda, seista, sööta, nutta, kütta
                      : IMPERATIVE ;        ! elagu, naergu, seisku, söötku, nutku, kütku
                      : NU ;                ! elanud, naernud, kütnud


LEXICON NU    !  NU-affixes
             !+Pers+Prt+Imprt:%>nud NO_COMPOUND ;         ! omitted for now because it would create homonymy
            +Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg:%>nud NO_COMPOUND ;
                +Pers+Prt+Prc:%>nud NO_COMPOUND ;
               +Pers+Prt+Quot:%>nuvat NO_COMPOUND ;
+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg+Usage/NotNorm:%>nd NO_COMPOUND ;
    +Pers+Prt+Prc+Usage/NotNorm:%>nd NO_COMPOUND ;
                    +Pers+Prt:%>nu CONDITIONAL ; ! conditional past
                             : NU_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON IMPERATIVE    ! imperative
       +Pers+Prs+Imprt:%>G7u NO_COMPOUND ;         ! elagu
   +Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1:%>G7em NO_COMPOUND ;        ! elagem
   +Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2:%>G7e NO_COMPOUND ;         ! elage

LEXICON SUPINE_V
         +Pers+Prs+Prc:%>v NO_COMPOUND ;
        +Pers+Prs+Quot:%>vat NO_COMPOUND ;
 @R.Part.One@           SUPINE_MA_FORMS ;    ! These can be 1st part of a compound
                      : MINE_DERIVATION ;    ! elamine
                      : JA_DERIVATION ;      ! elaja, õpetaja, õpetajanna, õpetajake, õpetajalik, ...
                      : V_DERIVATION ;       ! õpetav, õpetavalt, õpetavus, õpetavam, ...
                      : MATU_DERIVATION ;    ! segamatu, segamatult, segamatus, segamatum, ...
                      : MATA_DERIVATION ;     ! segamata
                      : MUS_DERIVATION ;     ! küllastumus, promoveerumus etc

LEXICON SUPINE_MA_FORMS
             +Pers+Sup:%>ma SUPINE ;
             
LEXICON SUPINE
                      : ILLATIVE ;          ! elama
                      :%>s INESSIVE ;       ! elamas
                      :%>st ELATIVE ;
                      :%>ks TRANSLATIVE ;
                      :%>ta ABESSIVE ;

LEXICON IMPERS    ! impersonal forms for most paradigms
                      :%>T7 IMPERS_DUD ;
                      :%>T7 IMPERS_AKSE ;
                      :»T7 IMPERS_DER  ;         

LEXICON IMPERS_DER    ! impersonal subparadigm-related derivations
                      : TAV_DERIVATION ;       ! elatav, elatavalt, elatavam, elatavaim, ... 
                      : TAMATU_DERIVATION ;       ! elatamatu 
                      : TU_DERIVATION ;       ! elatu, elatult, elatum, elatuim 


LEXICON IMPERS_DUD    ! impersonal forms -[td]ud

      +Impers+Prs+Cond:aks NO_COMPOUND ;
     +Impers+Prs+Imprt:agu NO_COMPOUND ;
   +Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg:a NO_COMPOUND ;
       +Impers+Prs+Prc:av NO_COMPOUND ;
      +Impers+Prs+Quot:avat NO_COMPOUND ;
      +Impers+Prt+Cond:uks NO_COMPOUND ;
   +Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff:i NO_COMPOUND ;
   +Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg:ud NO_COMPOUND ;
       +Impers+Prt+Prc:ud NO_COMPOUND ;
           +Impers+Sup:ama NO_COMPOUND ;

LEXICON IMPERS_AKSE    ! impersonal form -[td0]akse

   +Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff:akse NO_COMPOUND ;

LEXICON INFINITIVE    ! infinitive, gerund (des-form)

                      :%>D7 A_INFINITIVE ;

LEXICON A_INFINITIVE   ! common part of an infinitive, gerund (des-form);
                       ! also alone in a subparadigm of a few old words

 @R.Part.One@             INF_FORMS ;     ! This can be 1st part of a compound
                  +Ger:es NO_COMPOUND ;

LEXICON INF_FORMS
                  +Inf:a GI ;

LEXICON CONDITIONAL    ! conditional present and past  
                 +Cond:ks NO_COMPOUND ;
                 +Cond:ks MARKED_PERSON ;

LEXICON MARKED_PERSON     ! sg3 ~ underspecified is missing from here 
                      :i SG1 ;
                      :i SG2 ;
                      :i PL1 ;
                      :i PL2 ;
                      :i PL3 ;

LEXICON SG1
              +Sg1+Aff:n NO_COMPOUND ;

LEXICON SG2
              +Sg2+Aff:d NO_COMPOUND ;

LEXICON SG3
              +Sg3+Aff: NO_COMPOUND ;

LEXICON PL1
              +Pl1+Aff:me NO_COMPOUND ;

LEXICON PL2
              +Pl2+Aff:te NO_COMPOUND ;

LEXICON PL3
              +Pl3+Aff:d NO_COMPOUND ;

! a verb cannot participate in compounding;
! it has to be turned into a declinable word first
! flag diacritics are set on paths that are NOT changing the verb word class
! the flag diacritic @R.Part.One@ requires the stem to be the first in this word;
! and then @P.Part.Bad@ ensures that no further parts are possible

LEXICON NO_COMPOUND           ! this form cannot participate in a compound word
  @R.Part.One@@P.Part.Bad@ GI ;             

! paradigmatic derivation, i.e. very regular
! @R.Part.One@ means that this is not a latter part of a compound 
! @R.Case.Par@ and @R.Case.Gen@ mean that this is a latter part of a compound 
! and the previous word must be either in Par or Gen for this derivation to be allowable

LEXICON NU_DERIVATION
  @R.Part.One@@P.POS.N@  NU_DERIVATION_SUF ;   ! no previous part; no restrictions   
  @R.Case.Par@@P.POS.N@  NU_DERIVATION_SUF ;
  @R.Part.One@@P.POS.A@  NUD_DERIVATION_SUF ;   ! no previous part; no restrictions   
  @R.Case.Par@@P.POS.A@  NUD_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON NU_DERIVATION_SUF
             +Der/nu+N:»nu AASTA ;             ! derivation: elanu etc

LEXICON NUD_DERIVATION_SUF
             +Der/nud+A:»nu TUNTUD ;             ! derivation: elanud etc
             +Der/nud+A:»nud # ;             ! derivation: noninflecting A: elanud 

LEXICON TU_DERIVATION  !    NB! the morpheme border + d/t is assigned before this lexicon
  @R.Part.One@@P.POS.A@  TU_DERIVATION_SUF ;   ! no previous part; no restrictions   
  @R.Case.Gen@@P.POS.A@  TU_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON TU_DERIVATION_SUF  !    NB! the morpheme border + d/t is assigned before this lexicon
             +Der/tu+A:u AASTA ;              ! derivation: elatu etc
             +Der/tud+A:ud # ;             ! derivation: noninflecting A: elatud 
