src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON SimpleVerbs
appi=minema+V:˘appi= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
edasi=minema+V:edasi= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
erru=minema+V:˘erru= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
halvaks=minema+V:halvaks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
hapuks=minema+V:hapuks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
haraliseks=minema+V:haraliseks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
harvaks=minema+V:harvaks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
hinda=minema+V:h˘inda= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
hingusele=minema+V:h˘ingusele= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
hulluks=minema+V:hulluks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
härma=minema+V:h˘ärma= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
jahedaks=minema+V:jahedaks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
jooksu=minema+V:j˘ooksu= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
jõudsasti=minema+V:j˘õudsasti= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
jämedamaks=minema+V:jämedamaks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
jäässe=minema+V:j˘äässe= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kaduma=minema+V:kaduma= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kallale=minema+V:kallale= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kaotsi=minema+V:k˘aotsi= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kargu=minema+V:k˘argu= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
katki=minema+V:k˘atʲki= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
keerdu=minema+V:k˘eerdu= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
keerukamaks=minema+V:keerukamaks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kiiremaks=minema+V:k˘iiremaks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kinni=minema+V:k˘inʲni= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
klompi=minema+V:kl˘ompi= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
korda=minema+V:k˘orda= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kortsu=minema+V:k˘ortsu= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kriiskavaks=minema+V:kr˘iiskavaks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kummuli=minema+V:kummuli= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kurdu=minema+V:k˘urdu= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kõrgemaks=minema+V:k˘õrgemaks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kõvaks=minema+V:kõvaks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kõverasse=minema+V:kõverasse= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
käima=minema+V:k˘äima= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kämpu=minema+V:k˘ämpu= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
külla=minema+V:k˘ülla= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
külmale=minema+V:külmale= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
lahku=minema+V:l˘ahku= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
laiali=minema+V:laiali= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
lehte=minema+V:l˘ehte= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
lihtsaks=minema+V:l˘ihtsaks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
liiale=minema+V:liiale= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
looja=minema+V:l˘ooja= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
lukku=minema+V:l˘ukku= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
läbi=minema+V:läbi= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
madalamaks=minema+V:madalamaks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
mahedaks=minema+V:mahedaks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
meelest=minema+V:meelest= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
mehele=minema+V:mehele= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
minema+V: MINEMA  "weight: 3 " ; 
märki=minema+V:m˘ärki= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
nooremaks=minema+V:nooremaks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
närviliseks=minema+V:närviliseks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
nässu=minema+V:n˘ässu= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
odavamaks=minema+V:odavamaks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
pabinasse=minema+V:pabinasse= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
pankrotti=minema+V:p˘ankr˘otʲti= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
peale=minema+V:p˘eale= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
peenemaks=minema+V:peenemaks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
peitu=minema+V:p˘eitu= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
pikale=minema+V:pikale= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
pilve=minema+V:p˘ilve= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
pimedamaks=minema+V:pimedamaks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
puhevile=minema+V:puhevile= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
põhja=minema+V:p˘õhja= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
raisku=minema+V:r˘aisku= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
redusse=minema+V:redusse= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
rooste=minema+V:r˘ooste= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
sassi=minema+V:s˘asʲsi= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
sompu=minema+V:s˘ompu= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
sumedaks=minema+V:sumedaks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
tarvis=minema+V:t˘arvis= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
tugevamaks=minema+V:tugevamaks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
täkkesse=minema+V:t˘äkkesse= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
umbe=minema+V:˘umbe= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
uppi=minema+V:˘uppi= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
valgemaks=minema+V:v˘algemaks= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
varju=minema+V:v˘arju= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
vääriti=minema+V:vääriti= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
ära=minema+V:ära= MINEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
